Washington statutes.
RCW 11.68.140

Party to transactions—Presumption of necessity.

A party to a transaction with a personal representative with nonintervention powers and the party's successors in interest are entitled to have it conclusively presumed that the transaction is necessary for the administration of the decedent's estate.

[ 2021 c 140 s 4012.]

NOTES:

Application—2021 c 140 ss 4003-4017, 4023, 4024, and 4026: See note following RCW 11.48.130.